Illinois, session 104th, HB4902.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 8    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 9hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 10if:11        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 12    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 13    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 14    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 15    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 21    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 22    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 23    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible   HB4902- 2 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 2    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 3    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 4    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 5    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 6    of force against another person, residential burglary, 7    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 8    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 9    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 10    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 11    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 12    disability or disfigurement; 13        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 14    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 15    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 16    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 17    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 18    of the threat upon which the charge is based;19        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 20    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 21    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 22    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 23    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 24    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 25    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 26    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person   HB4902- 3 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    or persons or the community, based on the specific 2    articulable facts of the case;3        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 4    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 5    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 6    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 7    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 8    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 9    case;10        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 11    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 12    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 13    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 14    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 15    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 16    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 17    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 18    the case; 19        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 20    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 21    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 22    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 23    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 24    of the case:25            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 26        firearm);  HB4902- 4 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 2        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 3        designed or used for silencing the report of a 4        firearm);5            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 6        firearm);7            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 8        firearm by a repeat felony offender);9            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 10        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 11        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 12        or flechette shells);13            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 14        firearms);15            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 16        firearms on the premises of any school);17            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 18        liquor license);19            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 20        firearm);21            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);22            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);23            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);24            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 25        of a minor);26            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);  HB4902- 5 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 2        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 3        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 4        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 5        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 6        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 7            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 8        manslaughter);9            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);10            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);11            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 12        endangerment);13            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 14            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 15        restraint); 16            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 17            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 18        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 19        discharge of a firearm); 20        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 21    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 22    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 23    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 24    the specific articulable facts of the case: 25            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 26        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel   HB4902- 6 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);2            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 3        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 4        influence while operating a school bus with 5        passengers);6            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence causing great bodily harm);9            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 10        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 11        influence after a previous reckless homicide 12        conviction);13            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence leading to death); or16            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 17        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 18        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 19        under the age of 16);20        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 21    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 22    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 23    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 24    persons or the community, based on the specific 25    articulable facts of the case; or 26        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight   HB4902- 7 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:2            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 3        through (a)(7) of this Section; or4            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 5    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 6detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 7probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 8a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 9been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 10indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 11probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 12finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 13misdemeanor.14    (c) Timing of petition. 15        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 16    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 17    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 18    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 19    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 20    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 21    previously released shall not be detained.22        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 23    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 24    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 25    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 26    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree   HB4902- 8 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 2    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 3    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 4    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 5    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 6    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 7    filing of the petition and the hearing.8    (d) Contents of petition.9        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 10    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 11    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 12    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 13    persons or the community, based on the specific 14    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.15        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 16    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 17    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 18    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 19    filing of the previous petition.20    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 21for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 22proving by clear and convincing evidence that:23        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 24    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 25    subsection (a), and26        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7)   HB4902- 9 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 2    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 3    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 4    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 5    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 6    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 7    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 8    1986, and9        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 10    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 11    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 12    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 13    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 14    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 15    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 16    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and17        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 18    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 19    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 20    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 21    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 22    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 23    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 24    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 25    appear in court as required.26    (f) Conduct of the hearings.  HB4902- 10 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 2    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 3    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 4    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 5    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 6    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 7    hearing.8        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 9    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.10        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 11    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 12    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 13    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 14    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 15    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 16    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 17    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 18    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 19    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 20    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 21    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 22    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system, 23    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 24    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 25        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 26    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way   HB4902- 11 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 2    right to be present physically in court, the court 3    determines that the physical health and safety of any 4    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 5    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 6    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in 7    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 8    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 9    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges 10    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 11    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 12    6 months. 13        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 14    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 15    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 16    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 17    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 18    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 19    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 20    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 21    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 22    the court shall state on the record the reason for 23    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 24    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 25    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 26    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining   HB4902- 12 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 2    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 3    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 4    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 5    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 6    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 7    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 8    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 9    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 10    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 11    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 12    criminal history, if available, and any written or 13    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 14    statements made by any person, if in the State's 15    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 16        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 17    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 18    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 19    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 20    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 21    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 22    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 23    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 24    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.25        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 26    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged   HB4902- 13 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 2    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 3    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 4    the defendant.5        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 6    release, and detention prior to trial must be 7    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 8    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 9    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 10    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 11dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 12defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 13person or persons or the community, based on the specific 14articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 15limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:16        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 17    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 18    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.19        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 20    including:21            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 22        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 23        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 24        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 25        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 26        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.  HB4902- 14 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 2        psychiatric or other similar social history which 3        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 4        nature, or lack of any such history.5        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 6    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 7    nature of the threat.8        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 9    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 10    them.11        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.12        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 13    complaining witness. 14        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 15    access to any weapon or weapons.16        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 17    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 18    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 19    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 20    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 21    federal or State law.22        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 23    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 24    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 25    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 26    or lack of such behavior.  HB4902- 15 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 2detention:3        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 4    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 5    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 6    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 7    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 8    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 9    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;10        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 11    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 12    pending trial;13        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 14    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 15    communication with others of his or her choice by 16    visitation, mail and telephone; and17        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 18    required for appearances in connection with court 19    proceedings.20    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 21detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 22Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 23offense in accordance with for which he is detained within 90 24days after the date on which the order for detention was 25entered. If the defendant is not brought to trial within the 2690-day period required by the preceding sentence, he shall not   HB4902- 16 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1be denied pretrial release. In computing the 90-day period, 2the court shall omit any period of delay resulting from a 3continuance granted at the request of the defendant and any 4period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at the 5request of the State with good cause shown pursuant to Section 6103-5 (speedy trial).7    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 8before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 9is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 10of any person or persons or the community, based on the 11specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 12defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 13    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 14entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 15denying his or her pretrial release.16    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 17this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 18release.19    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 20shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 21defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 22proceedings.23    (m) Interest of victims. 24        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 25    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 26    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime   HB4902- 17 -LRB104 17023 RLC 30438 b1    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 2    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 3        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 4    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 5    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 6    defendant remains in custody. 7(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)